Washington statutes.
RCW 13.36.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Child" means any individual under the age of eighteen years.

(2) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.

(3) "Dependent child" means a child who has been found by a court to be dependent in a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.

(4) "Guardian" means a person who: (a) Has been appointed by the court as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding under this chapter; and (b) has the legal right to custody of the child pursuant to court order. The term "guardian" does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW for the purpose of assisting the court in supervising the dependency.

(5) "Relative" means a person related to the child in the following ways: (a) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and including first cousins, second cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great; (b) stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister; (c) a person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state law; (d) spouses of any persons named in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, even after the marriage is terminated; (e) relatives, as named in (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection, of any half sibling of the child; or (f) extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a person who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian child's grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a twenty-four hour basis to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);

(6) "Suitable person" means a nonrelative with whom the child or the child's family has a preexisting relationship; who has completed all required criminal history background checks and otherwise appears to be suitable and competent to provide care for the child; and with whom the child has been placed pursuant to RCW 13.34.130.

(7) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the state under RCW 74.15.090, or licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state under RCW 74.15.190, that has entered into a performance-based contract with the department to provide case management for the delivery and documentation of child welfare services as defined in RCW 74.13.020.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 419; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 310. Prior: 2010 c 272 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.